District of Columbia statutes.
29-404.11

Transfers.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, a member of a membership corporation shall not transfer a membership or any right arising therefrom.

(b)

If the right to transfer a membership has been provided, a restriction on that right shall not be binding with respect to a member holding a membership issued before the adoption of the restriction unless the restriction is approved by the affected member.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History